Georgia statutes. TITLE 35 Law Enforcement Officers and Agencies
Article 4 Missing Children Information Center

35-3-80.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Missing child” or “missing children” means a person or persons under the age of 18 years whose temporary or permanent residences are in, or are believed to be in, this state and who have been reported as missing to a law enforcement agency and whose location cannot be determined by that law enforcement agency.

“Missing child report” means a report prepared on a form designed by the Georgia Bureau of Investigation for the use by law enforcement agencies and private citizens to report information about missing children to the Missing Children Information Center.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-80

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 659, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 667, § 1.

35-3-81.
Establishment, development, maintenance, and operation of center; staff.

There is authorized within the Georgia Bureau of Investigation the Missing Children Information Center. The center shall serve as a central repository of information regarding missing children and shall collect and disseminate such information as is necessary to assist in the location of missing children.

Central responsibility for the development, maintenance, and operation of the center shall be vested in the supervisor of the center who shall be appointed by the director of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation.

The supervisor of the center shall maintain the necessary staff along with support services to be procured within the Georgia state government to enable the effective and efficient performance of the duties and responsibilities assigned to the center in this article.

All personnel of the center shall be administered according to appropriate special and standard schedules issued pursuant to the rules of the State Personnel Board.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-81

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 659, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-54/HB 642.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

35-3-82.
Powers and duties.

The center may:

Establish a system of intrastate communication of information relating to missing children;

Provide a centralized file for the exchange of information on missing children within the state;

Interface and connect with the National Crime Information Center for the exchange of information on missing children and children suspected of interstate travel;

Collect, process, maintain, and disseminate information on missing children and unidentified bodies and strive to maintain or disseminate only accurate and complete information;

Cooperate with the State Board of Education in compiling lists of missing children in this state for distribution to local school districts;

Compile annual statistics on the number of missing children;

Develop recommendations for better reporting and use of computer systems;

Provide assistance to local law enforcement agencies providing fingerprint programs for children;

Circulate a monthly bulletin of missing children to all law enforcement agencies in the state;

Assist local law enforcement agencies in establishing direct computer access to the Missing Children Information Center;

Act as a liaison between private citizens and law enforcement agencies regarding appropriate procedures for handling and responding to missing children reports; and

Establish a toll-free telephone number to assist individuals and agencies in the reporting of missing children and information relative to missing children.

The center is authorized to join and participate in any network of state missing children centers or clearing-houses, specifically including but not limited to the National Center for Missing and Exploited Children.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-82

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 659, § 1.

35-3-83.
Missing child reports.

Upon the filing of a police report by the parent, guardian, caretaker, governmental unit responsible for the child, or other person with legal custody of the child that a child is missing, the local law enforcement agency receiving such report shall notify all of its on-duty law enforcement officers of the existence of the missing child report, communicate the report to all other law enforcement agencies having jurisdiction in the county and all law enforcement agencies of jurisdictions geographically adjoining that of the local law enforcement agency, and transmit the report to the Missing Children Information Center.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-83

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 659, § 1; Ga. L. 2014, p. 481, § 1/SB 358.

35-3-84.
Sending information to center.

Every law enforcement agency and the Georgia Bureau of Investigation shall transmit to the Missing Children Information Center any information which is acquired or collected pursuant to Code Section 35-1-8 or Code Section 35-3-4, which information would assist in the location of any missing child.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-84

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 659, § 1.

35-3-85.
Registration of related organizations.

Any public or private organization which makes lists of or maintains records on missing children as a primary activity of that organization and which seeks to operate in the State of Georgia shall register with the Missing Children Information Center.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-85

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 659, § 1.